Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.071

Trustee's delegation of duties.

(1) A trustee may delegate duties and powers that a prudent trustee of comparable skills could properly delegate under the circumstances. The trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution in:

(a) Selecting a delegate;

(b) Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes and terms of the trust;

(c) Periodically reviewing the delegate's actions in order to monitor the delegate's performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation; and

(d) Enforcing the delegate's duties under the terms of the delegation.

(2) In performing a delegated function, in addition to any other duty inherent in the delegation, a delegate owes a duty to the trustee to exercise reasonable care to comply with the terms of the delegation.

(3) A trustee who complies with subsection (1) of this section is not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for an action of the delegate to whom the function was delegated. Nothing in this section relieves the trustee from any existing duty to compel the delegate to account for the delegate's actions.

(4) By accepting a delegation of powers or duties from the trustee of a trust that is subject to the law of this state, a delegate submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

(5) A delegation among co-trustees is governed by RCW 11.98.016.

[ 2015 c 115 s 3.]